Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3226.04
River-flow enhancement bonds; use of proceeds.

The proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to section 2-3226.01 shall only be used to pay or refinance the costs of (1) acquisition by purchase or lease of water rights in accordance with Chapter 46, article 6, pertaining to ground water, and Chapter 46, article 2, pertaining to surface water, including storage water rights with respect to a river or any of its tributaries, (2) acquisition by purchase or lease or the administration and management, pursuant to mutual agreement, of canals and other works, including reservoirs, constructed for irrigation from a river or any of its tributaries, (3) vegetation management, including, but not limited to, the removal of invasive species in or near a river or any of its tributaries, and (4) the augmentation of river flows consistent with the authority granted under Chapter 2, article 32.

Laws 2007, LB701, § 9.